dictsource/bn_rules
// Pronounciation rule for Bengali.
// Improvement input by Him Prasad Gautam (Nepal).
// This file is UTF8 encoded 

// letter groups:
// A   vowel letters and vowel signs
// B   vowel signs and virama ्
// C   consonants
// Y   vowel letters and vowel signs



// Inherent vowel dropped in the middle of a word (আপনি apni, আমরা amra,
// আকবর akbor). The rule lines marked "// generated" in each consonant group
// are not hand-written: android/tools/bn_schwa learns them from
// WikiPron (rule induction on 80% of the words) and writes them here. On the
// 20% it never saw, words read right went from 59.0% to 61.9% (50 fixed,
// 12 broken). Regenerate them with those tools rather than editing by hand.
// The "_L11) X (suffix_" lines are a hand rule for verb forms (বলতে bolte,
// করছে korchhe), which the word list the rules were learned from lacks.
// L10 = written vowels (signs, and independent vowels except অ);
// L11 = consonant letters; L12 = any Bengali letter.
.L10 া ি ী ু ূ ৃ ৄ ে ৈ ো ৌ আ ই ঈ উ ঊ ঋ এ ঐ ও ঔ
.L11 ক খ গ ঘ ঙ চ ছ জ ঝ ঞ ট ঠ ড ঢ ণ ত থ দ ধ ন ঩ প ফ ব ভ ম য র ঱ ল ঳ ঴ ঵ শ ষ স হ ড় ঢ় য়
.L12 অ আ ই ঈ উ ঊ ঋ ঌ ঍ ঎ এ ঐ ঑ ঒ ও ঔ ক খ গ ঘ ঙ চ ছ জ ঝ ঞ ট ঠ ড ঢ ণ ত থ দ ধ ন ঩ প ফ ব ভ ম য র ঱ ল ঳ ঴ ঵ শ ষ স হ া ি ী ু ূ ৃ ৄ ৅ ৆ ে ৈ ৉ ৊ ো ৌ ্ ড় ঢ় য় ং ঁ ঃ

.replace
 ০	0
 ১	1
 ২	2
 ৩	3
 ৪	4
 ৫	5
 ৬	6
 ৭	7
 ৮	8
 ৯	9


// Vowels


.group অ
       অ        V
       অঁ        O~
       অ্যা       &          // V,ja in [æmiba]
      

.group আ
       আ        a
       আঁ        a~

.group ই
        ই        i
        ইঁ        i~


.group ঈ
        ঈ        i
        ঈঁ        i~


.group উ
        উ        u
        উঁ        u~

        
.group ঊ
        ঊ        u
        ঊঁ        u~

.group ঋ
        ঋ        ri
        ঋঁ        ri~

.group ঌ
       ঌ         l-
       
       
.group এ
        এ        &
        এঁ        &~

        
.group ঐ
        ঐ        oj
        ঐঁ        o~j

        
.group এ
        এ        e
        এঁ        e~
        
        এ্যা       &    // e,ja  [ækademi]


.group ও
        ও        o
        ওঁ        o~

        
.group ঔ
        ঔ        ow
        ঔঁ        o~w

.group ও //??
        ও        o:


        

// Vowel Signs

.group া
	C) া	a
	C) াঁ	a~

.group ি
	C) ি	i
	C) িঁ	i~

.group ী
	C) ী	i
	C) ীঁ	i~

.group ূ
	C) ূ	u
	C) ূঁ	u~

.group ু
	C) ু	u
	C) ুঁ	u~

.group ৃ
	C) ৃ	r'i
	C) ৃঁ	r'i~

.group ে
	C) ে	e
	C) েঁ	e~
	C) েউ	ew

.group ৈ
	C) ৈ	oj
	C) ৈঁ	o~j

.group ো
	C) ো	o
	C) োঁ	o~

.group ৌ
	C) ৌ	ow
	C) ৌঁ	o~w
.group ৺
	৺(C	iSSor


       
// Consonants

.group ক
        ক        kV
        _া) ক (L11া_             k        // generated
        _া) ক (L11া              k        // generated
        _L12া) ক (L11া_          k        // generated
        _L12া) ক (L11া           k        // generated
        _L10) ক (L11L10_         k        // generated
        _L10) ক (L11L10          k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (L11L10_      k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (L11L10       k        // generated
        L10) ক (L11L10_          k        // generated
        L10) ক (L11L10           k        // generated
        _L10) ক (L11ু_           k        // generated
        _L10) ক (L11ু            k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (L11ু_        k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (L11ু         k        // generated
        L10) ক (L11ু_            k        // generated
        L10) ক (L11ু             k        // generated
        _L10) ক (ডL12L10         k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (ডL12L10      k        // generated
        L10) ক (ডL12L10          k        // generated
        _আ) ক (L11L10L11         k        // generated
        _L12আ) ক (L11L10L11      k        // generated
        আ) ক (L11L10L11          k        // generated
        _L10) ক (গL12_           k        // generated
        _L10) ক (গL12            k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (গL12_        k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (গL12         k        // generated
        L10) ক (গL12_            k        // generated
        L10) ক (গL12             k        // generated
        _া) ক (L11L12র           k        // generated
        _L12া) ক (L11L12র        k        // generated
        া) ক (L11L12র            k        // generated
        _ি) ক (L11া_             k        // generated
        _ি) ক (L11া              k        // generated
        _L12ি) ক (L11া_          k        // generated
        _L12ি) ক (L11া           k        // generated
        ি) ক (L11া_              k        // generated
        ি) ক (L11া               k        // generated
        _) ক (তা_                kV       // generated
        _L12) ক (তা_             kV       // generated
        _L12L12) ক (তা_          kV       // generated
        ক (তা_                   kV       // generated
        _L11) ক (L11ন_           k        // generated
        _L11) ক (L11ন            k        // generated
        _L12L11) ক (L11ন_        k        // generated
        _L12L11) ক (L11ন         k        // generated
        _পL12) ক (L11L10_        kV       // generated
        _পL12) ক (L11L10         kV       // generated
        পL12) ক (L11L10_         kV       // generated
        পL12) ক (L11L10          kV       // generated
        _লL10) ক (L11L12L11      k        // generated
        লL10) ক (L11L12L11       k        // generated
        _L10) ক (পL11_           k        // generated
        _L10) ক (পL11            k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (পL11_        k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (পL11         k        // generated
        L10) ক (পL11_            k        // generated
        L10) ক (পL11             k        // generated
        _L10) ক (_L12            k        // generated
        _L10) ক (L11L12_         k        // generated
        _L10) ক (L11L12          k        // generated
        _L10) ক (বL12্           k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (বL12্        k        // generated
        L10) ক (বL12্            k        // generated
        _খL10) ক (_L12           k        // generated
        _খL10) ক (L11L12_        k        // generated
        _খL10) ক (L11L12         k        // generated
        খL10) ক (_L12            k        // generated
        খL10) ক (L11L12_         k        // generated
        খL10) ক (L11L12          k        // generated
        _L11) ক (L11ী_           kV       // generated
        _L11) ক (L11ী            kV       // generated
        _ন) ক (L11L10_           k        // generated
        _ন) ক (L11L10            k        // generated
        _L12ন) ক (L11L10_        k        // generated
        _L12ন) ক (L11L10         k        // generated
        ন) ক (L11L10_            k        // generated
        ন) ক (L11L10             k        // generated
        _জ) ক (L11L10_           k        // generated
        _জ) ক (L11L10            k        // generated
        _L12জ) ক (L11L10_        k        // generated
        _L12জ) ক (L11L10         k        // generated
        জ) ক (L11L10_            k        // generated
        জ) ক (L11L10             k        // generated
        _া) ক (L11ে_             k        // generated
        _া) ক (L11ে              k        // generated
        _L12া) ক (L11ে_          k        // generated
        _L12া) ক (L11ে           k        // generated
        ্L12া) ক (_L12           k        // generated
        _L11L10) ক (হL12_        k        // generated
        _L11L10) ক (হL12         k        // generated
        L11L10) ক (হL12_         k        // generated
        L11L10) ক (হL12          k        // generated
        L10রL12) ক (_L12         k        // generated
        L10রL12) ক (L11L12_      k        // generated
        L10রL12) ক (L11L12       k        // generated
        _L10) ক (লL12য           k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (লL12য        k        // generated
        L10) ক (লL12য            k        // generated
        _L10) ক (চL12_           k        // generated
        _L10) ক (চL12            k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (চL12_        k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (চL12         k        // generated
        _এ) ক (L11L10_           k        // generated
        _এ) ক (L11L10            k        // generated
        _L12এ) ক (L11L10_        k        // generated
        _L12এ) ক (L11L10         k        // generated
        এ) ক (L11L10_            k        // generated
        এ) ক (L11L10             k        // generated
        L10L12L10) ক (L11L12ন    kV       // generated
        _L10) ক (তে_             k        // generated
        _L10) ক (তে              k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (তে_          k        // generated
        _L12L10) ক (তে           k        // generated
        L10) ক (তে_              k        // generated
        L10) ক (তে               k        // generated
        _র) ক (L11াL11           k        // generated
        _L12র) ক (L11াL11        k        // generated
        র) ক (L11াL11            k        // generated
        _L11) ক (তে_             k        // generated
        _L11) ক (লে_             k        // generated
        _L11) ক (ছে_             k        // generated
        _L11) ক (লাম_            k        // generated
        _L11) ক (তাম_            k        // generated
        _L11) ক (ছি_             k        // generated
        _L11) ক (ছিল_            k        // generated
        _L11) ক (লো_             k        // generated
        _L11) ক (বে_             k        // generated
        _L11) ক (বো_             k        // generated
        _L11) ক (লেন_            k        // generated
        _L11) ক (তেন_            k        // generated
        _L11) ক (ছেন_            k        // generated
        _L11) ক (বেন_            k        // generated
        _L11) ক (তিস_            k        // generated
        _L11) ক (লি_             k        // generated
        _L11) ক (ছিস_            k        // generated
        ক (B     k

        ক্ষ        k#k#V   // or [k#:] ?
        ক্ষ (B     k#k#
